Hawaii statutes.
§92F-14 Significant privacy interest;
examples. (a) Disclosure of a government record shall not constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy if the public interest in
disclosure outweighs the privacy interest of the individual.

(b) The following are examples of information
in which the individual has a significant privacy interest:

(1) Information relating to medical, psychiatric, or
psychological history, diagnosis, condition, treatment, or evaluation, other
than directory information while an individual is present at such facility;

(2) Information identifiable as part of an
investigation into a possible violation of criminal law, except to the extent
that disclosure is necessary to prosecute the violation or to continue the
investigation;

(3) Information relating to eligibility for social
services or welfare benefits or to the determination of benefit levels;

(4) Information in an agency's personnel file, or
applications, nominations, recommendations, or proposals for public employment
or appointment to a governmental position, except:

(A) Information disclosed under section
92F-12(a)(14); and

(B) The following information related to
employment misconduct that results in an employee's suspension or discharge:

(i) The name of the employee;

(ii) The nature of the employment related
misconduct;

(iii) The agency's summary of the allegations of
misconduct;

(iv) Findings of fact and conclusions of law;
and

(v) The disciplinary action taken by the
agency;

when the following has occurred: the highest
nonjudicial grievance adjustment procedure timely invoked by the employee or
the employee's representative has concluded; a written decision sustaining the
suspension or discharge has been issued after this procedure; and thirty
calendar days have elapsed following the issuance of the decision or, for
decisions involving county police department officers, ninety days have elapsed
following the issuance of the decision; provided that subparagraph (B) shall
not apply to a county police department officer except in a case which results
in the discharge of the officer;

(5) Information relating to an individual's
nongovernmental employment history except as necessary to demonstrate
compliance with requirements for a particular government position;

(6) Information describing an individual's finances,
income, assets, liabilities, net worth, bank balances, financial history or
activities, or creditworthiness;

(7) Information compiled as part of an inquiry into
an individual's fitness to be granted or to retain a license, except:

(A) The record of any proceeding resulting in
the discipline of a licensee and the grounds for discipline;

(B) Information on the current place of
employment and required insurance coverages of licensees; and

(C) The record of complaints including all
dispositions;

(8) Information comprising a personal recommendation
or evaluation;

(9) Social security numbers; and

(10) Information that if disclosed would create a
substantial and demonstrable risk of physical harm to an individual. [L 1988, c
262, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 191, §1; am L 1995, c 242, §1; am L 2004, c 92, §4;
am L 2014, c 121, §2; am L 2015, c 140, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Board of education
members may disclose reasons they voted as they did in executive session
resulting in appointment of education superintendent; they cannot disclose
information discussed in executive session if information is of the type listed
in subsection (b) without first determining to what extent disclosure is in
public interest. Att. Gen. Op. 94-1.

Law Journals and Reviews

Driving into the
Sunset: A Proposal for Mandatory Reporting to the DMV by Physicians Treating
Unsafe Elderly Drivers. 25 UH L. Rev. 59.

Case Notes

Information that must
be disclosed pursuant to clause (b)(4)(B) regarding a public employee's
employment-related misconduct and resulting discipline not "highly
personal and intimate information" and thus not within scope of Hawaii's
constitutional right to privacy. 83 H. 378, 927 P.2d 386.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next